Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-555
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Newborn Critical Congenital
Heart Disease Screening Act:

(1) Birthing facility means
a hospital or other health care facility in this state which provides birthing
and newborn care services;

(2) Critical congenital heart disease screening
means a testing procedure or procedures intended to detect hypoplastic left
heart syndrome, pulmonary atresia, tetralogy of Fallot, total anomalous pulmonary
venous return, transposition of the great arteries, tricuspid atresia, and
truncus arteriosus;

(3) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(4) Newborn
means a child from birth through twenty-nine days old; and

(5) Parent
means a natural parent, a stepparent, an adoptive parent, a legal guardian,
or any other legal custodian of a child.

Laws 2013, LB225, § 3.